de: Matten-Grundmaterial: Kork; Elastomer; Ethylen-Vinylacetat (EVA); Jute; Latex; Memoryschaum; Nylon; Polyethylen (PE); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Schilf; Gummi; Elasthan; Synthesekautschuk; Thermoplastisches Elastomer (TPE); Vinyl; Sonstiges
tr: Mat taban malzemesi: Mantar; Elastomer; Etilen vinil asetat (EVA); Jüt; Lateks; Hafızalı köpük; Plastik; Polietilen (PE); Polivinil klorür (PVC); Kamış; Kauçuk; Spandeks; Sentetik kauçuk; Termoplastik elastomer (TPE); Vinil; Diğer
es: Material de la base de la alfombrilla: Corcho; Elastómero; Acetato de etileno y vinilo (EVA); Yute; Látex; Espuma viscoelástica; Nylon; Polietileno (PE); Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Caña; Goma; Spandex; Caucho sintético; Elastómero termoplástico (TPE); Vinilo; Otros
pl: Materiał bazowy maty: Korek; Elastomery; Polietylen-co-oktan winylu (EVA); Juta; Lateks; Pianka pamięciowa; Nylon; Polietylen (PE); Polichlorek winylu (PVC); Trzcinowy; Guma; Spandex; Kauczuk syntetyczny; Elastomer termoplastyczny (TPE); Winyl; Inne
da: Grundmateriale for måtte: Kork; Elastomer; Ethylen-vinylacetat (EVA); Jute; Latex; Memoryskum; Nylon; Polyethylen (PE); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Siv; Gummi; Spandex; Syntetisk gummi; Termoplastisk elastomer (TPE); Vinyl; Andet
el: Υλικό βάσης σε χαλάκι: Φελλός; Ελαστομερές; Πολυμερές αιθυλενίου και οξικού βινυλίου (EVA); Γιούτα; Λάτεξ; Αφρός μνήμης; Νάιλον; Πολυαιθυλένιο (PE); Πολυβινυλοχλωρίδιο (PVC); Καλάμι; Καουτσούκ; Σπαντέξ; Συνθετικό καουτσούκ; Θερμοπλαστικό ελαστομερές (TPE); Βινύλιο; Άλλο
hr-HR: Osnovni materijal otirača: Pluto; Elastomer; Etilen vinil acetat (EVA); Juta; Lateks; Memorijska pjena; Najlon; Polietilen (PE); Polivinil klorid (PVC); Trska; Guma; Elastan; Sintetička guma; Termoplastični elastomer (TPE); Vinil; Ostalo
en: Mat base material: Cork; Elastomer; Ethylene vinyl acetate (EVA); Jute; Latex; Memory foam; Nylon; Polyethylene (PE); Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Reed; Rubber; Spandex; Synthetic rubber; Thermoplastic elastomer (TPE); Vinyl; Other
zh-TW: 墊子底面材質: 軟木; 彈性體; 乙烯醋酸乙烯酯共聚物; 黃麻; 乳膠; 記憶棉; 尼龍; 聚乙烯 (PE); 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 蘆葦; 橡膠; 氨綸; 合成橡膠; 熱塑性彈性體 (TPE); 乙烯基; 其他
ro-RO: Material de bază preș: Plută; Elastomer; Etilen acetat de vinil (EVA); Iută; Latex; Spumă cu memorie; Nailon; Polietilenă (PE); Clorură de polivinil (PVC); Stuf; Cauciuc; Spandex; Cauciuc sintetic; Elastomer termoplastic (TPE); Vinyl; Altele
pt-BR: Material base do tapete: Cortiça; Elastômero; Etileno acetato de vinila (EVA); Juta; Látex; Espuma de memória; Nylon; Polietileno (PE); Cloreto de polivinila (PVC); Junco; Borracha; Spandex; Borracha sintética; Elastômero termoplástico (TPE); Vinil; Outro
nb: Mattebunnmateriale: Kork; Elastomer; Etylenvinylacetat (EVA); Jute; Lateks; Minneskum; Nylon; Polyetylen (PE); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Reed; Gummi; Spandex; Syntetisk gummi; Termoplastisk elastomer (TPE); Vinyl; Annet
sk-SK: Základný materiál rohože: Korok; Elastomér; Etylénvinylacetát (EVA); Juta; Latex; Pamäťová pena; Nylon; Polyetylén (PE); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Trstina; Guma; Elastan; Syntetická guma; Termoplastický elastomér (TPE); Vinyl; Iné
ru: Материал основы ковра: Пробка; Эластомер; Этиленвинилацетат (ЭВА); Джут; Латекс; Пена с эффектом памяти; Нейлон; Полиэтилен (ПЭ); Поливинилхлорид (ПВХ); Тростник; Резина; Спандекс; Синтетический каучук; Термопластичный эластомер (ТПЭ); Винил; Другое
th: วัสดุพื้นฐานของเสื่อ: ต้นคอร์ก; อีลาสโตเมอร์; อีทิลีนไวนิลอะซิเตต (EVA); ใยปอ; ยางพารา; เมมโมรีโฟม; ไนลอน; โพลิเอทิลีน (PE); โพลิไวนิลคลอไรด์ (PVC); กก; ยาง; สแปนเด็กซ์; ยางสังเคราะห์; เทอร์โมพลาสติกเอลาสโตเมอร์ (TPE); ไวนิล; อื่นๆ
vi: Vật liệu nền thảm: Thảm gỗ bần; Chất đàn hồi; Ethylene vinyl acetate (EVA); Sợi đay; Mủ cao su; Cao su non; Nylon; Polyethylene (PE); Polyvinyl chloride (PVC); Cây sậy; Cao su; Vải Spandex; Cao su tổng hợp; Elastomer nhiệt dẻo (TPE); Nhựa vinyl; Khác
pt-PT: Material da base do tapete: Cortiça; Elastómero; Etileno acetato de vinilo (EVA); Juta; Látex; Material viscoelástico; Náilon; Polietileno (PE); Cloruro de polivinilo (PVC); Junco; Borracha; Elastano; Borracha sintética; Elastómero termoplástico (TPE); Vinil; Outro
hu: Szőnyeg hátoldalának anyaga: Parafa; Elasztomer; Etilén-vinil-acetát (EVA); Juta; Latex; Memóriahab; Nejlon; Polietilén (PE); Polivinil-klorid (PVC); Nád; Gumi; Spandex; Szintetikus gumi; Hőre lágyuló elasztomer (TPE); Vinil; Egyéb
bg-BG: Материал за основата на постелка: Корк; Еластомер; Етиленвинилацетат (EVA); Юта; Латекс; Мемори пяна; Найлон; Полиетилен (PE); Поливинилхлорид (PVC); Тръстика; Каучук; Спандекс; Синтетичен каучук; Термопластичен еластомер (TPE); Винил; Други
lt-LT: Kilimėlio pagrindo medžiaga: Kamštiena; Elastomeras; Etileno vinilo acetatas (EVA); Džiutas; Lateksas; Formą išsaugantis porolonas; Nailonas; Polietilenas (PE); Polivinilchloridas (PVC); Nendrės; Kaučiukas; Elastanas; Sintetinė guma; Termoplastinis elastomeras (TPE); Vinilas; Kita
fr: Matériau de base du tapis: Liège; Élastomère; Éthylène-acétate de vinyle (EVA); Jute; Latex; Mousse à mémoire de forme; Nylon; Polyéthylène (PE); Chlorure de polyvinyle (PVC); Roseau; Caoutchouc; Spandex; Caoutchouc synthétique; Élastomère thermoplastique (TPE); Vinyl; Autre
sv: Mattbas - material: Kork; Elastomer; Etenvinylacetat (EVA); Jute; Latex; Minnesskum; Nylon; Polyeten (PE); Polyvinylklorid (PVC); Vass; Gummi; Spandex; Syntetiskt gummi; Termoplastisk elastomer (TPE); Vinyl; Övrigt
cs: Materiál základu rohože: Korek; Elastomer; Ethylen vinylacetát (EVA); Juta; Latex; Paměťová pěna; Nylon; Polyethylen (PE); Polyvinylchlorid (PVC); Rákos; Guma; Spandex; Syntetická guma; Termoplastický elastomer (TPE); Vinylové; Jiné
sl-SI: Material spodnje strani podloge: Pluta; Elastomer; Etilen vinil acetat (EVA); Juta; Latex; Spominska pena; Najlon; Polietilen (PE); Polivinilklorid (PVC); Trstika; Guma; Spandex; Sintetična guma; Termoplastični elastomer (TPE); Vinil; Drugo
nl: Materiaal basis mat: Kurk; Elastomeer; Ethyleen-vinylacetaat (EVA); Jute; Latex; Traagschuim; Nylon; Polyethyleen (PE); Polyvinylchloride (PVC); Riet; Rubber; Spandex; Synthetisch rubber; Thermoplastisch elastomeer (TPE); Vinyl; Andere
ko: 매트 베이스 소재: 코르크; 엘라스토머; 에틸렌 비닐 아세테이트(EVA); 주트; 라텍스; 메모리 폼; 나일론; 폴리에틸렌(PE); 폴리염화비닐(PVC); 갈대; 고무; 스판덱스; 인조 고무; 열가소성 엘라스토머(TPE); 비닐; 기타
it: Materiale base opaco: Sughero; Elastomero; Etilene acetato di vinile (EVA); Iuta; Lattice; Memory foam; Nylon; Polietilene (PE); Cloruro di polivinile (PVC); Giunco; Gomma; Spandex; Gomma sintetica; Elastomero termoplastico (TPE); Vinile; Altro
fi: Maton pohjamateriaali: Korkki; Elastomeeri; Eteenivinyyliasetaatti (EVA); Juutti; Lateksi; Muistivaahto; Nailon; Polyeteeni (PE); Polyvinyylikloridi (PVC); Ruoko; Kumi; Spandex; Synteettinen kumi; Termoplastinen elastomeeri (TPE); Vinyyli; Muu
zh-CN: 地垫基材: 软木; 弹性体; 乙烯醋酸乙烯酯 (EVA); 黄麻; 乳胶; 记忆海绵; 尼龙; 聚乙烯 (PE); 聚氯乙烯 (PVC); 芦苇; 橡胶; 氨纶; 合成橡胶; 热塑性弹性体 (TPE); 乙烯基贴纸; 其他
ja: マット基材: コルク; エラストマー; エチレン酢酸ビニルアセテート (EVA); ジュート; ラテックス; メモリーフォーム; ナイロン; ポリエチレン (PE); ポリ塩化ビニル (PVC); リード; ゴム; スパンデックス; 合成ゴム; 熱可塑性エラストマー (TPE); ビニール; その他